Louisiana, session 2026, HB828.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part XX of Chapter 7 of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 15:1199.44 and 1199.45, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART XX. CORRECTIONAL MEDICAL REVIEW BOARD
§1199.44. Louisiana Correctional Medical Review Board; establishment;
composition; powers
A. Created in this Part is the Louisiana Correctional Medical Review Board,
hereinafter referred to as the "review board," as an independent body within the
office of the legislative auditor, separate and independent from the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1248 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 828
B. The review board shall consist of nine members as follows:
(1) Three physicians licensed to practice medicine in this state, at least one
of whom shall be board-certified in forensic pathology, appointed by the Louisiana
State Medical Society.
(2) One registered nurse with correctional care experience, appointed by the
Louisiana State Nurses Association.
(3) One attorney with demonstrated experience in civil rights or prisoner
rights litigation, appointed by the Louisiana State Bar Association.
(4) One representative of a nonprofit organization that advocates for
incarcerated persons or their families, appointed by the governor.
(5) One former law enforcement or correctional administrator with at least
ten years of experience, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(6) One public health expert, appointed by the secretary of the Louisiana
Department of Health.
(7) One immediate family member of a person who died while in the custody
of a Louisiana correctional facility, appointed by the President of the Senate.
C.(1) No member of the review board shall be currently employed by,
contracted with, or have a financial interest in any correctional facility or the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
(2) Members shall serve four-year staggered terms and may be reappointed
once. Initial appointments will be staggered terms so that approximately half the
terms expire every two years.
(3) A member may be removed by a two-thirds vote of the full review board
for cause, including malfeasance, nonfeasance, or neglect of duty.
D. The review board shall conduct an independent review of every in-
custody death occurring in a correctional facility in this state, without exception.
Review shall be initiated within seventy-two hours of the death being reported to the
review board pursuant to Subsection E of this Section.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1248 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 828
E.(1) The warden or facility administrator of any correctional facility in
which an in-custody death occurs shall notify the review board within two hours of
the confirmed time of death.
(2) Notification shall include the name and booking number of the deceased,
the time and location of death, a preliminary account of the circumstances, and the
identity of any medical personnel who responded.
(3) Failure to provide timely notification shall subject the warden or facility
administrator to a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars per day for each day notification is delayed, assessed by the
review board and payable to the state general fund.
F. In conducting any review, the review board has all of the following
powers:
(1) To compel the production of all medical records, incident reports,
surveillance footage, communications logs, and any other documentation related to
the death, within five business days of the request.
(2) To interview, under oath, any correctional officer, staff member, medical
personnel, inmate witness, or other person with relevant knowledge. The review
board may issue subpoenas to compel attendance and testimony, enforceable in the
district court of the parish where the facility is located.
(3) To conduct unannounced inspections of the correctional facility relevant
to the death.
(4) To retain independent forensic pathologists, toxicologists, or other
medical experts at state expense to review autopsy findings, medical records, or other
evidence.
(5) To request and review any prior incident reports, medical emergency
records, or review board findings related to the same facility.
G. In any case where the cause of death is disputed, unclear, or involves
allegations of staff misconduct or failure to render aid. the following may or shall
occur:
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1248 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 828
(1) The review board may order an independent autopsy to be performed by
a forensic pathologist selected by the review board who has no prior relationship
with the facility or the decedent.
(2) The cost of the independent autopsy shall be borne by the state.
(3) Results of the independent autopsy shall be provided to the review board,
the decedent's immediate family, and the attorney of record for the estate, if any.
H.(1) Within sixty days of initiating a review, the review board shall issue
a written report containing all of the following:
(a) A factual summary of the circumstances of the death.
(b) A determination of whether the correctional facility complied with the
requirements of this Part.
(c) A determination of whether any staff member failed to render aid,
delayed response, falsified records, or otherwise violated this Part.
(d) Specific recommendations for corrective action, including but not limited
to staff retraining, facility policy changes, personnel disciplinary action, or criminal
referral.
(e) Any systemic findings applicable to other correctional facilities.
(2) The review board may extend the review period by an additional thirty
days upon written notice stating the reason for the extension.
I.(1) If the review board determines that there is probable cause to believe
that a criminal violation of R.S. 15:1199.39 or any other provision of law occurred,
it shall refer the matter to the attorney general and the district attorney of the relevant
parish for criminal investigation and prosecution.
(2) If the review board determines that a civil rights violation may have
occurred, it shall refer the matter to the United States Department of Justice, Civil
Rights Division.
(3) If the review board finds that a licensed healthcare professional failed to
meet the applicable standard of care, it shall refer the matter to the relevant
professional licensing board.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1248 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 828
J.(1) All review board reports shall be public records available on the review
board's website within ten business days of issuance.
(2) The identity of inmate witnesses who request confidentiality shall be
redacted from public reports. The review board shall take all reasonable measures
to protect inmate witnesses from retaliation.
(3) The review board shall publish an annual summary report no later than
February first of each year, including the total number of in-custody deaths reviewed,
findings by category and facility, referrals made, and corrective actions taken or
pending.
K. The immediate family of a deceased inmate, or a legal representative,
shall have the right to do all of the following:
(1) Receive a copy of the review board's full report within five business days
of issuance.
(2) Submit written statements or evidence to the review board for
consideration during the review period.
(3) Appear before the review board to provide testimony during any public
hearing held in connection with the review.
L. No correctional officer, staff member, administrator, or any other person
shall retaliate against any inmate, staff member, or other witness who cooperates
with a review board investigation. Retaliation constitutes a separate violation of this
Part subject to the civil and criminal penalties provided in R.S. 15:1199.38 and R.S.
15:1199.39.
M.(1) The legislature shall appropriate sufficient funds to support the
operations of the review board, including staff, legal counsel, expert witness fees,
independent autopsy costs, and administrative expenses.
(2) The review board shall employ at least one full-time executive director,
one full-time staff attorney, and such other staff as necessary to fulfill its duties
established in this Part.
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1248 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 828
(3) Members of the review board who are not public employees shall receive
a per diem of one hundred fifty dollars for each day of official service, plus
reimbursement of reasonable travel expenses.
N. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit or replace the
investigative jurisdiction of any law enforcement agency, the legislative auditor, the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, or any court of competent jurisdiction.
The review board's function is supplemental and independent.
§1199.45. Rulemaking
A. The Department of Public Safety and Corections shall promulgate rules
and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this Part pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act.
B. The review board shall adopt rules of procedure governing its review
process, subpoena practice, public hearing procedures, witness confidentiality
protections, and report issuance, consistent with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Section 2. The review board staffing and appropriations provisions of R.S.
15:1199.44(M) and the rulemaking provisions of R.S. 15:1199.45(B) shall become effective
upon signature by the governor or upon expiration of the time for bills to become law
without a signature. All remaining provisions shall become effective on January 1, 2027.